apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüß</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Antroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres"/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="frm" 	c="Formal"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine-Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine/feminine/neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral / Number"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal (pronoun)"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="nn" 	c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> 
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="Dative"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular/Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Lexical verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="The verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="The verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxilliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" 	c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Participle"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="attr" 	c="Attributive"/> 
    <sdef n="pred" 	c="Predicative"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb"/> 
    <sdef n="fs" 	c="Seperable verb in subordinate clause"/> 
    <sdef n="fm" 	c="Seperable verb in main clause"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/> 
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percentage"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <sdef n="ndel" 	c="Final n-deletion"/> 
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c="Abbreviation"/> 
    <sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="Compound"/> 
    <sdef n="compound-R" 	c="Compound"/> 
    <sdef n="cmp" 	c="Compound"/> 
    <sdef n="cmp-split" 	c="Compound"/> 
    <sdef n="lower" 	c="Lower case"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

<pardef n="separa">
  <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quot">
  <e>       <re>[„«]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[“»]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <re>[’'‘]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>–</l>         <r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+(([.,: ][0-9]+)+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>.</l><r>.<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="n">    <!-- paradigm for final n-deletion -->
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ndel"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nn">    <!-- paradigm for final n-deletion -->
  <e>       <p><l>nn</l>        <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ndel"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="en">    <!-- paradigm for final n-deletion (noun plural: -en => -ë) -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r><s n="ndel"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Compounding -->

<pardef n="cmp" c="cmp, for forms that can be at the beginning or end of compounds">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cmp-R" c="cmp-R, for forms that can only end compounds">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l><r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cmp-L" c="cmp-L, for forms that can only appear at the beginning or inside compounds">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

<pardef n="/ech__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>ech</l>       <r>ech<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mir</l>       <r>ech<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>ech<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mech</l>      <r>ech<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/du__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>du</l>        <r>du<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>du<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dir</l>       <r>du<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>       <r>du<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dech</l>      <r>du<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ech">             <i></i><par n="/ech__prn"/></e>
<e lm="du">              <i></i><par n="/du__prn"/></e>
<e lm="bannen">          <p><l>gebonne</l>   <r>bannen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="bidden">          <p><l>gebuede</l>   <r>bidden</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="doen">            <p><l>gedoe</l>     <r>doen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="dreiwen">         <p><l>gedriwwe</l>  <r>dreiwen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="droen">           <p><l>gedroe</l>    <r>droen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="dréngen">         <p><l>gedronge</l>  <r>dréngen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="fléien">          <p><l>geflu</l>     <r>fléien</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="nn"/></e>
<e lm="freien">          <p><l>gefrie</l>    <r>freien</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="frieden">         <p><l>gefruede</l>  <r>frieden</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="fänken">          <p><l>gefaange</l>  <r>fänken</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="halen">           <p><l>gehale</l>    <r>halen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="hiewen">          <p><l>gehuewe</l>   <r>hiewen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="hänken">          <p><l>gehaange</l>  <r>hänken</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="leien">           <p><l>geleeë</l>    <r>leien</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="lueden">          <p><l>geluede</l>   <r>lueden</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="léien">           <p><l>gelu</l>      <r>léien</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="nn"/></e>
<e lm="quëllen">         <p><l>gequolle</l>  <r>quëllen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="reiwen">          <p><l>geriwwe</l>   <r>reiwen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="rënnen">          <p><l>geronne</l>   <r>rënnen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="schloen">         <p><l>geschloe</l>  <r>schloen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="schreiwen">       <p><l>geschriwwe</l><r>schreiwen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="schwëllen">       <p><l>geschwolle</l><r>schwëllen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="stierwen">        <p><l>gestuerwe</l> <r>stierwen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="stoen">           <p><l>gestane</l>   <r>stoen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="weien">           <p><l>gewie</l>     <r>weien</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="weisen">          <p><l>gewise</l>    <r>weisen</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="n"/></e>
<e lm="zéien">           <p><l>gezu</l>      <r>zéien</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/><par n="nn"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="quot"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
